Massachusetts, session 194th, H3719.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 176 of said chapter 160 of the General Laws as so appears is hereby amended by
inserting after the word "cars" the following words:- or tracks and by inserting after the word
"commonwealth" the following new language:- Hot Box detectors shall be installed every 20
miles on any line in which passenger trains operate. Such shall be included in any new
construction project and within one year of the passage of said law on all existing lines.
of 1